Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.320

Actions against license—Procedures.

In the case of the refusal, revocation, or suspension of a license by the board under the provisions of this chapter, such proceedings and any appeal therefrom shall be taken in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2022 c 85 s 12; 1986 c 295 s 13; 1983 c 234 s 14; 1949 c 226 s 31; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 8269-38.]